dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3031 N 1
SFX 3031 0 ndekiler .

SFX 3032 N 1
SFX 3032 0 ndekileri .

SFX 3033 N 1
SFX 3033 0 ndekilerin .

SFX 3034 N 1
SFX 3034 0 ndekinde .

SFX 3035 N 1
SFX 3035 0 ndekine .

SFX 3036 N 1
SFX 3036 0 ndekini .

SFX 3037 N 1
SFX 3037 0 ndekinin .

SFX 3038 N 1
SFX 3038 0 ndekiyle .

SFX 3039 N 1
SFX 3039 0 ndekiyse .

SFX 3040 N 1
SFX 3040 0 ndendi .

SFX 3041 N 1
SFX 3041 0 ndendir .

SFX 3042 N 1
SFX 3042 0 ndenim .

SFX 3043 N 1
SFX 3043 0 ndeniz .

SFX 3044 N 1
SFX 3044 0 nizdim .

SFX 3045 N 1
SFX 3045 0 nizimdir .

SFX 3046 N 1
SFX 3046 0 nizse .

SFX 3047 N 1
SFX 3047 0 ndenler .

SFX 3048 N 1
SFX 3048 0 ndenmişçesine .

SFX 3049 N 1
SFX 3049 0 ndense .

SFX 3050 N 1
SFX 3050 0 ndensen .

SFX 3051 N 1
SFX 3051 0 ndensin .

SFX 3052 N 1
SFX 3052 0 ndensiniz .

SFX 3053 N 1
SFX 3053 0 ndesin .

SFX 3054 N 1
SFX 3054 0 ndesiniz .

SFX 3055 N 1
SFX 3055 0 ndeydi .

SFX 3056 N 1
SFX 3056 0 ndeyim .

SFX 3057 N 1
SFX 3057 0 ndeyiz .

SFX 3058 N 1
SFX 3058 0 ndeyken .

SFX 3059 N 1
SFX 3059 0 ndeymiş .

SFX 3060 N 1
SFX 3060 0 ndeyse .

SFX 3061 N 1
SFX 3061 0 ndik .

SFX 3062 N 1
SFX 3062 0 ndin .

SFX 3063 N 1
SFX 3063 0 ndiniz .

SFX 3064 N 1
SFX 3064 0 'nün .

SFX 3065 N 1
SFX 3065 0 imdeyse .

SFX 3066 N 1
SFX 3066 0 imdin .

SFX 3067 N 1
SFX 3067 0 nimdir .

SFX 3068 N 1
SFX 3068 0 iminkilere .

SFX 3069 N 1
SFX 3069 0 imken .

SFX 3070 N 1
SFX 3070 0 imki .

SFX 3071 N 1
SFX 3071 0 imkidir .

SFX 3072 N 1
SFX 3072 0 imkiler .

SFX 3073 N 1
SFX 3073 0 imkilerde .

SFX 3074 N 1
SFX 3074 0 imkilerden .

SFX 3075 N 1
SFX 3075 0 imkilerdir .

SFX 3076 N 1
SFX 3076 0 imkilere .

SFX 3077 N 1
SFX 3077 0 imkileri .

SFX 3078 N 1
SFX 3078 0 imkilerin .

SFX 3079 N 1
SFX 3079 0 imkilerini .

SFX 3080 N 1
SFX 3080 0 imkilerinse .

SFX 3081 N 1
SFX 3081 0 imkilerle .

SFX 3082 N 1
SFX 3082 0 imkilerse .

SFX 3083 N 1
SFX 3083 0 imkinde .

SFX 3084 N 1
SFX 3084 0 imkinden .

SFX 3085 N 1
SFX 3085 0 imkine .

SFX 3086 N 1
SFX 3086 0 imkini .

SFX 3087 N 1
SFX 3087 0 imkinin .

SFX 3088 N 1
SFX 3088 0 imkiydi .

SFX 3089 N 1
SFX 3089 0 imkiyle .

SFX 3090 N 1
SFX 3090 0 imkiymiş .

SFX 3091 N 1
SFX 3091 0 imkiyse .

SFX 3092 N 1
SFX 3092 0 imledir .

SFX 3093 N 1
SFX 3093 0 imleler .

SFX 3094 N 1
SFX 3094 0 imlesin .

SFX 3095 N 1
SFX 3095 0 imlesiniz .

SFX 3096 N 1
SFX 3096 0 imleydi .

SFX 3097 N 1
SFX 3097 0 imleydiniz .

SFX 3098 N 1
SFX 3098 0 imleyken .

SFX 3099 N 1
SFX 3099 0 imleymiş .

SFX 3100 N 1
SFX 3100 0 imleysen .

SFX 3101 N 1
SFX 3101 0 imleyseniz .

SFX 3102 N 1
SFX 3102 0 immişsin .

SFX 3103 N 1
SFX 3103 0 imsek .

SFX 3104 N 1
SFX 3104 0 mizdendir .

SFX 3105 N 1
SFX 3105 0 rmişiz .

SFX 3106 N 1
SFX 3106 0 imizdendi .

SFX 3107 N 1
SFX 3107 0 nmişim .

SFX 3108 N 1
SFX 3108 0 nsem .

SFX 3109 N 1
SFX 3109 0 nsen .

SFX 3110 N 1
SFX 3110 0 rdin .

SFX 3111 N 1
SFX 3111 0 rmişim .

SFX 3112 N 1
SFX 3112 0 iyorduysanız .

SFX 3113 N 1
SFX 3113 0 tilerse .

SFX 3114 N 1
SFX 3114 0 eysek .

SFX 3115 N 1
SFX 3115 0 imdekiler .

SFX 3116 N 1
SFX 3116 0 imdekilere .

SFX 3117 N 1
SFX 3117 0 imdekilerin .

SFX 3118 N 1
SFX 3118 0 indekilerce .

SFX 3119 N 1
SFX 3119 0 indekilerde .

SFX 3120 N 1
SFX 3120 0 indekilerden .

SFX 3121 N 1
SFX 3121 0 indekilere .

SFX 3122 N 1
SFX 3122 0 indekilerin .

SFX 3123 N 1
SFX 3123 0 indekilerine .

SFX 3124 N 1
SFX 3124 0 indekilerinin .

SFX 3125 N 1
SFX 3125 0 indekilerle .

SFX 3126 N 1
SFX 3126 0 inizdekileri .

SFX 3127 N 1
SFX 3127 0 dekilerse .

SFX 3128 N 1
SFX 3128 0 ndekilerle .

SFX 3129 N 1
SFX 3129 0 sindekileri .

SFX 3130 N 1
SFX 3130 0 mizdeydik .

SFX 3131 N 1
SFX 3131 0 sinidir .

SFX 3132 N 1
SFX 3132 0 rcesine .

SFX 3133 N 1
SFX 3133 0 rdiniz .

SFX 3134 N 1
SFX 3134 0 irlikleri .

SFX 3135 N 1
SFX 3135 0 ninkilerden .

SFX 3136 N 1
SFX 3136 0 'ıma .

SFX 3137 N 1
SFX 3137 0 'ımın .

SFX 3138 N 1
SFX 3138 0 'ımızın .

SFX 3139 N 1
SFX 3139 0 'tadır .

SFX 3140 N 1
SFX 3140 0 'takinin .

SFX 3141 N 1
SFX 3141 0 imizdeyken .

SFX 3142 N 1
SFX 3142 0 lerindeydim .

SFX 3143 N 1
SFX 3143 0 yleymiş .

SFX 3144 N 1
SFX 3144 0 ymişim .

SFX 3145 N 1
SFX 3145 0 yidir .

SFX 3146 N 1
SFX 3146 0 indense .

SFX 3147 N 1
SFX 3147 0 indiler .

SFX 3148 N 1
SFX 3148 0 ininkini .

SFX 3149 N 1
SFX 3149 0 inkinin .

SFX 3150 N 1
SFX 3150 0 lerimizdeymiş .

SFX 3151 N 1
SFX 3151 0 lerinizdeydi .

SFX 3152 N 1
SFX 3152 0 'nda .

SFX 3153 N 1
SFX 3153 0 'ndaki .

SFX 3154 N 1
SFX 3154 0 'ndan .

SFX 3155 N 1
SFX 3155 0 'ndaydı .

SFX 3156 N 1
SFX 3156 0 'ndayız .

SFX 3157 N 1
SFX 3157 0 er .

SFX 3158 N 1
SFX 3158 0 erdi .

SFX 3159 N 1
SFX 3159 0 erim .

SFX 3160 N 1
SFX 3160 0 erken .

SFX 3161 N 1
SFX 3161 0 erler .

SFX 3162 N 1
SFX 3162 0 erlerdi .

SFX 3163 N 1
SFX 3163 0 ermiş .

SFX 3164 N 1
SFX 3164 0 erseniz .

SFX 3165 N 1
SFX 3165 0 ersin .

SFX 3166 N 1
SFX 3166 0 ndiler .

SFX 3167 N 1
SFX 3167 0 ninkiler .

SFX 3168 N 1
SFX 3168 0 acaktıysak .

SFX 3169 N 1
SFX 3169 0 ırlarmışçasına .

SFX 3170 N 1
SFX 3170 0 yaydın .

SFX 3171 N 1
SFX 3171 0 ninkidir .

SFX 3172 N 1
SFX 3172 0 erdik .

SFX 3173 N 1
SFX 3173 0 erdim .

SFX 3174 N 1
SFX 3174 0 eriz .

SFX 3175 N 1
SFX 3175 0 erlerken .

SFX 3176 N 1
SFX 3176 0 erlerse .

SFX 3177 N 1
SFX 3177 0 erse .

SFX 3178 N 1
SFX 3178 0 ersek .

SFX 3179 N 1
SFX 3179 0 ersen .

SFX 3180 N 1
SFX 3180 0 ersiniz .

SFX 3181 N 1
SFX 3181 0 imidir .

SFX 3182 N 1
SFX 3182 0 inizdi .

SFX 3183 N 1
SFX 3183 0 yleydim .

SFX 3184 N 1
SFX 3184 0 ymuşsunuz .

SFX 3185 N 1
SFX 3185 0 lerinizdi .

SFX 3186 N 1
SFX 3186 0 ecektiler .

SFX 3187 N 1
SFX 3187 0 ecektiniz .

SFX 3188 N 1
SFX 3188 0 ecektirler .

SFX 3189 N 1
SFX 3189 0 üyor .

SFX 3190 N 1
SFX 3190 0 yeceğizdir .

SFX 3191 N 1
SFX 3191 0 zmişiz .

SFX 3192 N 1
SFX 3192 0 lerdendirler .

SFX 3193 N 1
SFX 3193 0 lerdensinizdir .

SFX 3194 N 1
SFX 3194 0 lerimizinse .

SFX 3195 N 1
SFX 3195 0 miştiler .

SFX 3196 N 1
SFX 3196 0 eydik .

SFX 3197 N 1
SFX 3197 0 eydin .

SFX 3198 N 1
SFX 3198 0 eydiniz .

SFX 3199 N 1
SFX 3199 0 lerinizdedir .

SFX 3200 N 1
SFX 3200 0 mizdeydi .

SFX 3201 N 1
SFX 3201 0 nizdedir .

SFX 3202 N 1
SFX 3202 0 larlarına .

SFX 3203 N 1
SFX 3203 0 mcesi .

SFX 3204 N 1
SFX 3204 0 mcesinde .

SFX 3205 N 1
SFX 3205 0 mcesiyle .

SFX 3206 N 1
SFX 3206 0 msem .

SFX 3207 N 1
SFX 3207 0 ncedir .

SFX 3208 N 1
SFX 3208 0 ncedirler .

SFX 3209 N 1
SFX 3209 0 irliğim .

SFX 3210 N 1
SFX 3210 0 irliğimiz .

SFX 3211 N 1
SFX 3211 0 irliğimizi .

SFX 3212 N 1
SFX 3212 0 irliğindeki .

SFX 3213 N 1
SFX 3213 0 irliklerini .

SFX 3214 N 1
SFX 3214 0 irliğimi .

SFX 3215 N 1
SFX 3215 0 irliğimize .

SFX 3216 N 1
SFX 3216 0 irliğimizin .

SFX 3217 N 1
SFX 3217 0 irliğinde .

SFX 3218 N 1
SFX 3218 0 irliğinden .

SFX 3219 N 1
SFX 3219 0 irliğinize .

SFX 3220 N 1
SFX 3220 0 irliğinizle .

SFX 3221 N 1
SFX 3221 0 irliğiyle .

SFX 3222 N 1
SFX 3222 0 irlikler .

SFX 3223 N 1
SFX 3223 0 irliklerinde .

SFX 3224 N 1
SFX 3224 0 irliklerinden .

SFX 3225 N 1
SFX 3225 0 irliklerine .

SFX 3226 N 1
SFX 3226 0 irliklerinin .

SFX 3227 N 1
SFX 3227 0 irlikte .

SFX 3228 N 1
SFX 3228 0 irmişçesine .

SFX 3229 N 1
SFX 3229 0 iyorduysa .

SFX 3230 N 1
SFX 3230 0 irmişsiniz .

SFX 3231 N 1
SFX 3231 0 iyordular .

SFX 3232 N 1
SFX 3232 0 iyorlarmışçasına .

SFX 3233 N 1
SFX 3233 0 iyorsalar .

SFX 3234 N 1
SFX 3234 0 iyorsundur .

SFX 3235 N 1
SFX 3235 0 teysen .

SFX 3236 N 1
SFX 3236 0 zcesine .

SFX 3237 N 1
SFX 3237 0 zdiler .

SFX 3238 N 1
SFX 3238 0 ziz .

SFX 3239 N 1
SFX 3239 0 zmişim .

SFX 3240 N 1
SFX 3240 0 zmişsiniz .

SFX 3241 N 1
SFX 3241 0 mızdaydık .

SFX 3242 N 1
SFX 3242 0 nınkiyle .

SFX 3243 N 1
SFX 3243 0 lerimizdendi .

SFX 3244 N 1
SFX 3244 0 lercedir .

SFX 3245 N 1
SFX 3245 0 lercemiz .

SFX 3246 N 1
SFX 3246 0 lercesi .

SFX 3247 N 1
SFX 3247 0 lercesinde .

SFX 3248 N 1
SFX 3248 0 lercesinden .

SFX 3249 N 1
SFX 3249 0 lercesini .

SFX 3250 N 1
SFX 3250 0 lercesinin .

SFX 3251 N 1
SFX 3251 0 lercesiyle .

SFX 3252 N 1
SFX 3252 0 lerdeydik .
