dictionaries/tr/index.dic
bende/5,7,8,35,36,38,39,40,41,54,254,255,256,257,312,315,327,333,335,339,348,357,359,390,408,409,410,411,412,420,1240,1486,3044,3045,3046
benze/6,105,319,341,343,344,510,526,527,584,608,618,650,651,652,657,658,666,667,714,715,717,718,719,720,1162,1165,1171,1172,1227,1274,1275,1280,1281,1286,1287,1288,1291,2683,2737,2983,2985,2986,2987,3008,3009,3010,3011,3012,3013,3014,3015,3017,3018,3019,3105,3110,3111
bet/33,34,35,37,38,39,42,43,223,256,261,263,266,267,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,287,318,535,658,967,968,983,3094
denet/33,34,35,37,39,107,108,111,112,261,263,264,266,272,275,276,318,326,328,341,342,383,384,421,626,649,653,656,658,671,680,967,968,1174,1182,1183,1184,1245,1268,1352,1360,1850,1871,2178,2462,2574,2787,2975,3065,3069,3181,3269,3854,3855,4064
hamil/38,39,255,256,331,333,335,336,682,871,965,966,1225,2119,2754,2757,2758,2760,3114,3197,3264,4547,5113,5114
hepsi/5,8,53,260,284,285,323,333,348,389,390,401,402,405,406,407,413,422,424,485,1325,1481,1482,1483,1489,1870,1988,3040,3042,3057
hissi/5,6,8,35,53,54,284,285,311,312,315,316,323,325,345,346,348,385,389,390,391,395,396,401,402,404,407,409,411,412,422,424,1240,1489,3007,3049,3055,3056,3057,4031,4371
iletiş/33,261,263,264,265,266,267,270,272,273,276,649,653,656,871,967,968,1182,1184,1245,1850,2178,2458,3069,3117,3269,3270,3854,3855,3856,4065,4550,4655
kete/5,6,7,8,35,36,38,39,53,54,257,315,316,323,325,348,374,385,389,390,401,402,403,1489,1870,3040
Köprübaşı/3152
mersi/5,6,8,41,53,54,323,348,390,401,402,403,404,406,419,1325,1489,1985,3030,3031,3034,3035,3037,3055,3056,3057,3058,3060,3257,3808,4370,4371
meti/5,6,35,53,54,257,323,335,348,401,402,403,404,406,407,1325,1489,1490,1870,1985,1990,2554,3006,3007,3030,3033,3036,3037,3055,3059,3060,3166,3257,4514,4947
nezaket/33,34,35,37,38,42,43,255,256,261,262,263,264,266,267,268,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,281,282,283,288,318,319,333,339,341,539,653,654,967,968,970,976,983,1187,1195,1196,2509,2510,3106
ötesi/5,260,284,285,323,348,401,402,406,426,1325,3030,3031,3032,3033,3035,3036,3038,3054,3055,3056,3057,3058,3059,3060,3128,3808,4031,4370,4678,4958,5532,6013,6014
özeli/5,8,53,54,284,285,311,312,323,325,345,346,348,385,386,388,389,390,391,392,395,396,399,400,401,402,403,407,409,411,426,528,964,1240,1325,1470,1484,1486,3007,3055,3060
saki/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,37,38,39,53,54,252,257,260,315,317,323,335,348,401,402,403,404,407,413,1489,1490,1870,1985,1990,2554,3005,3006,3007,3028,3061,3062,3063,3067,3166,3321,4172,6067
sekli/9999,1,8,53,323,348,401,402,1325,3055
sili/5,53,54,323,403,407,1183,1490,1870,1985,1990,3007,3028,3061,3063,3108,3166,4392,4509,4514,4516,4518
STÖ/244,484,1863,1977,2563,3064,3782,3956,4129
sürgü/9999,2,3,6,8,35,36,38,39,41,53,252,253,256,323,335,401,402,768,769,770,771,1325,1489,1677,1694,1699,1705,2123,2554,2895,3007,3030,3031,3032,3033,3035,3053,3055,3056,3057,3058,3059,3128,3502,3716,3745,3806,3807,3808,4371,4373,4374,4388,4390,4678,6013,6248
şekli/9999,2,3,5,6,8,53,54,252,284,285,311,312,316,323,325,345,346,348,385,386,387,389,390,391,392,393,395,396,399,401,402,407,409,411,412,413,424,426,528,552,964,1240,1325,1484,1486,1489,1870,1980,1985,3030,3031,3032,3036,3041,3055,3056,3057,3058,3059,3060,3715,3807,3808,4371,4958
tepesi/5,284,285,323,348,401,402,409,424,1325,3030,3031,3032,3033,3036,3037,3054,3055,3056,3057,3058,3059,3060,3128,3257,3806,3807,3808,4031,4370,4371,6013,6325
tepi/5,8,35,37,39,256,257,258,260,314,315,323,338,1985,1990,3007,3028,3061,3109,3166,3321,4392
terbiye/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,38,53,54,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,311,313,314,315,316,323,325,333,335,339,346,347,348,349,355,359,360,386,389,390,391,392,393,395,396,399,407,409,411,1486,1489,2226,3104
tiksi/53,323,1490,1985,1990,3028,3061,3062,3063,3108,3109,4392,4515
yedi/9999,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,252,256,257,258,259,260,283,284,311,313,314,315,316,323,355,359,387,389,390,391,392,401,402,421,424,504,507,1243,1870,2120,2394,2721,3046,3448
yeryüzü/9999,3,8,53,54,323,401,402,768,769,1325,1696,1699,3030,3031,3033,3058,3060,3128,3807,3808,4604,5691
